lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/verb-suffixing/verb-derivSuffix_semiFinalE.txt
!==================
LEXICON NegationVII
!==================
0:0                                             ModalVII;
^@~%:(ng)igate(V→V):^%{.sf.%}iga%{t%}e**        ModalVI; ! to never V; to not be V-ing at the present time
^@laaghigate(V→V):^laaghiga%{t%}e**             ModalVI; ! to seldom V; to infrequently V; to not V enough; inadequately V
^–pagigate(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagiga%{t%}e**          ModalVI; ! to V infrequently; to seldom V 
^–qiigate(V→V):^%{.m.%}qiiga%{t%}e**            ModalVI; ! to never briefly V
^~%:(ng)ite(V→V):^%{.sf.%}i%{t%}e**             ModalVI; ! to lack the quality of V 
^–pagite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagi%{t%}e**              ModalVI; ! for there not to be much V-ness
^–ketiite(V→V):^ketii%{t%}e**                   ModalVI; ! to not tend to V 
^–llgite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llgi%{t%}e**              ModalVI; ! to V poorly
^–llgiite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llgii%{t%}e**            ModalVI; ! to become a poor V-er
^@~%:(i/u)mangite(V→V):^%{.sf.%}umangi%{t%}e**  ModalVI; ! to not have V-ed
^–pagumangite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagumangi%{t%}e**    ModalVI; ! to not have V-ed so much
^@~fniite(V→V):^nii%{t%}e**                     ModalVI; ! to not cause one to V
^@~fnaanghite(V→V):^naanghi%{t%}e*              ModalVI; ! to not V in the future; won't V
^–pagnaanghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagnaanghi%{t%}e**  ModalVI; ! to not V too much, very much in the future 
^@–nghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}nghi%{t%}e**             ModalVI; ! to not V
^+panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                 ModalVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^–panghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}panghi%{t%}e**          ModalVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^+pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**             ModalVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–pagunghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagunghi%{t%}e**      ModalVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–llghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llghi%{t%}e**            ModalVI; ! to not V
^+pagningite(V→V):^pagningi%{t%}e**             ModalVI; ! to not be able to V; cannot V
^+yaghqiite(V→V):^yaghqii%{t%}e**               ModalVI; ! to not to have to V
^@~f–yiite(V→V):^%{.m.%}yii%{t%}e**             ModalVI; ! to poorly V habitually
^+yugniite(V→V):^yugnii%{t%}e**                 ModalVI; ! to not find it easy to V; to not want to V
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^nanigh                         ModalIV; ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^nanighqe                     ModalII; ! to make one cease V-ing


!--------------------
! the auxiliary node
!--------------------

!===============
LEXICON ModalVII
!===============
0:0                                        InterModalPastVII;
^@~–(g)kayugu(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kayugu  InterModalPastI;  ! to be able to V; can V
^@~fnaqe(V→V):^naqe                        InterModalPastII; ! to be going to V in the near future; to try to V
^@~fnaqlaatagh(V→V):^naqlaatagh            InterModalPastIV; ! to V again be going to V
^–qaghnaqe(V→V):^%{.m.%}qaghnaqe           InterModalPastII; ! to be about to V for a moment 
^@~fna(V→V):^na                            InterModalPastI;  ! in order to V; to V 
^@~fnaqngu(V→V):^naqngu                    InterModalPastI;  ! to have to V
^@~fyaghqaqe(V→V):^yaghqaqe                InterModalPastII; ! to need to V; to be supposed to V; to V in the future
^@~fyaghqaa(V→V):^yaghqaa                  InterModalPastI;  ! to need to V; to be supposed to V; to V in the future
^@~fyaghqau(V→V):^yaghqau                  InterModalPastI;  ! to need to V; to be supposed to V; to V in the future
^@~fnayagh(V→V):^nayagh                    InterModalPastIV; ! could V; might V; should V; would V
^–qaghnayagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}qaghnayagh       InterModalPastIV; ! would V for a short time


!========================
LEXICON InterModalPastVII
!========================
0:0                                             PastTenseVII;
^@~%:(ng)igate(V→V):^%{.sf.%}iga%{t%}e**        PastTenseVI; ! to never V; to not be V-ing at the present time
^@laaghigate(V→V):^laaghiga%{t%}e**             PastTenseVI; ! to seldom V; to infrequently V; to not V enough; inadequately V
^–pagigate(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagiga%{t%}e**          PastTenseVI; ! to V infrequently; to seldom V 
^–qiigate(V→V):^%{.m.%}qiiga%{t%}e**            PastTenseVI; ! to never briefly V
^~%:(ng)ite(V→V):^%{.sf.%}i%{t%}e**             PastTenseVI; ! to lack the quality of V 
^–pagite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagi%{t%}e**              PastTenseVI; ! for there not to be much V-ness
^–ketiite(V→V):^ketii%{t%}e**                   PastTenseVI; ! to not tend to V 
^–llgite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llgi%{t%}e**              PastTenseVI; ! to V poorly
^–llgiite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llgii%{t%}e**            PastTenseVI; ! to become a poor V-er
^@~%:(i/u)mangite(V→V):^%{.sf.%}umangi%{t%}e**  PastTenseVI; ! to not have V-ed
^–pagumangite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagumangi%{t%}e**    PastTenseVI; ! to not have V-ed so much
^@~fniite(V→V):^nii%{t%}e**                     PastTenseVI; ! to not cause one to V
^@~fnaanghite(V→V):^naanghi%{t%}e*              PastTenseVI; ! to not V in the future; won't V
^–pagnaanghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagnaanghi%{t%}e**  PastTenseVI; ! to not V too much, very much in the future 
^@–nghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}nghi%{t%}e**             PastTenseVI; ! to not V
^+panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                 PastTenseVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^–panghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}panghi%{t%}e**          PastTenseVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^+pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**             PastTenseVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–pagunghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagunghi%{t%}e**      PastTenseVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–llghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llghi%{t%}e**            PastTenseVI; ! to not V
^+pagningite(V→V):^pagningi%{t%}e**             PastTenseVI; ! to not be able to V; cannot V
^+yaghqiite(V→V):^yaghqii%{t%}e**               PastTenseVI; ! to not to have to V
^@~f–yiite(V→V):^%{.m.%}yii%{t%}e**             PastTenseVI; ! to poorly V habitually
^+yugniite(V→V):^yugnii%{t%}e**                 PastTenseVI; ! to not find it easy to V; to not want to V
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^nanigh                         PastTenseIV; ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^nanighqe                     PastTenseII; ! to make one cease V-ing


!===================
LEXICON PastTenseVII
!===================
0:0                                    InterPastProgVII;
^@~–(g)kaqe(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kaqe  InterPastProgII; ! to have V-ed (him/it) 
^@~–(g)kau(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kau    InterPastProgI;  ! to have V-ed; to have been V-ed
^@~%:(i/u)ma(V→V):^%{.sf.%}uma         InterPastProgI;  ! to have V-ed or been V-ed; to be in a state of having V-ed or been V-ed; to evidently have V-ed or been V-ed


!=======================
LEXICON InterPastProgVII
!=======================
0:0                                             ProgressiveAspectVII;
^@~%:(ng)igate(V→V):^%{.sf.%}iga%{t%}e**        ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to never V; to not be V-ing at the present time
^@laaghigate(V→V):^laaghiga%{t%}e**             ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to seldom V; to infrequently V; to not V enough; inadequately V
^–pagigate(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagiga%{t%}e**          ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to V infrequently; to seldom V 
^–qiigate(V→V):^%{.m.%}qiiga%{t%}e**            ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to never briefly V
^~%:(ng)ite(V→V):^%{.sf.%}i%{t%}e**             ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to lack the quality of V 
^–pagite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagi%{t%}e**              ProgressiveAspectVI; ! for there not to be much V-ness
^–ketiite(V→V):^ketii%{t%}e**                   ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not tend to V 
^–llgite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llgi%{t%}e**              ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to V poorly
^–llgiite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llgii%{t%}e**            ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to become a poor V-er
^@~%:(i/u)mangite(V→V):^%{.sf.%}umangi%{t%}e**  ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not have V-ed
^–pagumangite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagumangi%{t%}e**    ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not have V-ed so much
^@~fniite(V→V):^nii%{t%}e**                     ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not cause one to V
^@~fnaanghite(V→V):^naanghi%{t%}e*              ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not V in the future; won't V
^–pagnaanghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagnaanghi%{t%}e**  ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not V too much, very much in the future 
^@–nghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}nghi%{t%}e**             ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not V
^+panghite(V→V):^panghi%{t%}e**                 ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^–panghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}panghi%{t%}e**          ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
^+pagunghite(V→V):^pagunghi%{t%}e**             ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–pagunghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagunghi%{t%}e**      ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not be sufficiently V
^–llghite(V→V):^%{.m.%}llghi%{t%}e**            ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not V
^+pagningite(V→V):^pagningi%{t%}e**             ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not be able to V; cannot V
^+yaghqiite(V→V):^yaghqii%{t%}e**               ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not to have to V
^@~f–yiite(V→V):^%{.m.%}yii%{t%}e**             ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to poorly V habitually
^+yugniite(V→V):^yugnii%{t%}e**                 ProgressiveAspectVI; ! to not find it easy to V; to not want to V
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^nanigh                         ProgressiveAspectIV; ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^nanighqe                     ProgressiveAspectII; ! to make one cease V-ing


!===========================
LEXICON ProgressiveAspectVII
!===========================
0:0                                    InterProgFutVII;
^~(g)aqe(V→V):^%{.sf.%}aqe             InterProgFutII; ! to be currently V-ing; to V now and then; to always V
^~(g)aqlaatagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}aqlaatagh  InterProgFutIV; ! to be V-ing again, one more time 
